Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.040

Information, documents, and reports are public records—Inspection—Publication.

All information, documents, and reports filed with the secretary of state under this chapter are matters of public record and shall be open to public inspection, subject to reasonable regulation: PROVIDED, That the secretary of state shall withhold from public inspection any trust instrument so filed whose content is not exclusively for charitable purposes. The secretary of state may publish, on a periodic or other basis, such information as may be necessary or appropriate in the public interest concerning the registration, reports, and information filed with the secretary of state or any other matters relevant to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 471 s 26; 1985 c 30 s 115. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 4. Formerly RCW 19.10.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.